lib/dict/lv_LV.aff
SFX x Y 51
SFX x  s   as   [j]s
SFX x  s   ai   [j]s
SFX x  s   âm   [j]s
SFX x  s   âs   [j]s
SFX x  gs  ìe   [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ìes  [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ìei  [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ìi   [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ìç   [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ìu   [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ìçm  [o]gs
SFX x  gs  ìçs  [o]gs
SFX x  ks  ce   nieks
SFX x  ks  ces  nieks
SFX x  ks  cei  nieks
SFX x  ks  ci   nieks
SFX x  ks  cç   nieks
SFX x  ks  èu   nieks
SFX x  ks  cçm  nieks
SFX x  ks  cçs  nieks
SFX x  s  e   [flrst]s
SFX x  s  es  [flrst]s
SFX x  s  ei  [flrst]s
SFX x  s  ç   [flrst]s
SFX x  s  çm  [flrst]s
SFX x  s  çs  [flrst]s
SFX x  s   e    [aâeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   es   [aâeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   ei   [aâeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   ç    [aâeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   çm   [aâeodt][nr]s
SFX x  s   çs   [aâeodt][nr]s
SFX x  ns  òu    [^ç]ns
SFX x  is  e    [ílnprt]is
SFX x  is  es   [ílnprt]is
SFX x  is  ei   [ílnprt]is
SFX x  is  ç    [ílnprt]is
SFX x  is  çm   [ílnprt]is
SFX x  is  çs   [ílnprt]is
SFX x e es e
SFX x e em e
SFX x e i  e
SFX x e ç  e
SFX x e çm e
SFX x e çs e
SFX x a as a
SFX x a am a
SFX x a u  a
SFX x a â  a
SFX x a âm a
SFX x a âs a

SFX P Y 24
SFX P   is    a      [^bcdlmnpvtsz]is
SFX P   is    ja     [bpmv]is
SFX P   cis   èa     [c]is
SFX P   dis   þa     [d]is
SFX P   sis   ða     [s]is
SFX P   tis   ða     [^as][t]is
SFX P   is    a      [a][t]is
SFX P   is    a      [s][t]is
SFX P   zis   þa     [z]is
SFX P   nis   òa     [^lsz][n]is
SFX P   lis   ïa     [^lsz][l]is
SFX P   lnis  ïòa    [l]nis
SFX P   snis  ðòa    [s]nis
SFX P   znis  þòa    [z]nis
SFX P   llis  ïïa    [l]lis
SFX P   nnis  òòa    [n]nis
SFX P   slis  ðïa    [s]lis
SFX P   zlis  þïa    [z]lis
SFX P   s     m      [i]s
SFX P   s     0      [i]s
SFX P   is    î      [i]s
SFX P   s     im     [lns]s
SFX P   s     i      [lns]s
SFX P   s     î      [lns]s

SFX j Y 95
SFX j   is    ji     [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    i      [ìríj]is
SFX j   tis   ði     [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    i      [a][t]is
SFX j   is    i      [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   èi     [c]is
SFX j   dis   þi     [d]is
SFX j   zis   þi     [z]is
SFX j   sis   ði     [s]is
SFX j   nis   òi     [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ïi     [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ïòi    [l]nis
SFX j   snis  ðòi    [s]nis
SFX j   znis  þòi    [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ïïi    [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  òòi    [n]nis
SFX j   slis  ðïi    [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  þïi    [z]lis
SFX j   ns    òi     [n]s
SFX j   is    ju     [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    u      [ìríj]is
SFX j   tis   ðu     [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    u      [a][t]is
SFX j   is    u      [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   èu     [c]is
SFX j   dis   þu     [d]is
SFX j   zis   þu     [z]is
SFX j   sis   ðu     [s]is
SFX j   nis   òu     [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ïu     [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ïòu    [l]nis
SFX j   snis  ðòu    [s]nis
SFX j   znis  þòu    [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ïïu    [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  òòu    [n]nis
SFX j   slis  ðïu    [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  þïu    [z]lis
SFX j   ns    òu     [n]s
SFX j   is    jiem   [bpmv]is
SFX j   s     em     [ìríj]is
SFX j   tis   ðiem   [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    iem    [a][t]is
SFX j   is    iem    [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   èiem   [c]is
SFX j   dis   þiem   [d]is
SFX j   zis   þiem   [z]is
SFX j   sis   ðiem   [s]is
SFX j   nis   òiem   [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ïiem   [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ïòiem  [l]nis
SFX j   snis  ðòiem  [s]nis
SFX j   znis  þòiem  [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ïïiem  [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  òòiem  [n]nis
SFX j   slis  ðïiem  [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  þïiem  [z]lis
SFX j   ns    òiem   [n]s
SFX j   is    jus    [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    us     [ìríj]is
SFX j   tis   ðus    [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    us     [a][t]is
SFX j   is    us     [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   èus    [c]is
SFX j   dis   þus    [d]is
SFX j   zis   þus    [z]is
SFX j   sis   ðus    [s]is
SFX j   nis   òus    [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ïus    [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ïòus   [l]nis
SFX j   snis  ðòus   [s]nis
SFX j   znis  þòus   [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ïïus   [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  òòus   [n]nis
SFX j   slis  ðïus   [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  þïus   [z]lis
SFX j   ns    òus    [n]s
SFX j   is    jos    [bpmv]is
SFX j   is    os     [ìríj]is
SFX j   tis   ðos    [^as][t]is
SFX j   is    os     [a][t]is
SFX j   is    os     [s][t]is
SFX j   cis   èos    [c]is
SFX j   dis   þos    [d]is
SFX j   zis   þos    [z]is
SFX j   sis   ðos    [s]is
SFX j   nis   òos    [^lsz][n]is
SFX j   lis   ïos    [^lsz][l]is
SFX j   lnis  ïòos   [l]nis
SFX j   snis  ðòos   [s]nis
SFX j   znis  þòos   [z]nis
SFX j   llis  ïïos   [l]lis
SFX j   nnis  òòos   [n]nis
SFX j   slis  ðïos   [s]lis
SFX j   zlis  þïos   [z]lis
SFX j   ns    òos    [n]s

SFX u Y 6
SFX u   is     îtis  [i]s
SFX u   is     îða   [i]s
SFX u   is     îtim  [i]s
SFX u   is     îti   [i]s
SFX u   is     îtî   [i]s
SFX u   is     ît    [i]s

SFX w Y 5
SFX w   is     îði   [i]s
SFX w   is     îðu   [i]s
SFX w   is     îðiem [i]s
SFX w   is     îðus  [i]s
SFX w   is     îðos  [i]s




SFX S Y 12
SFX S  0   s   [ae]
SFX S  0   i   [ae]
SFX S  a   u    a
SFX S  a   â    a
SFX S  e   i    e
SFX S  e   ç    e
SFX S  s   ij  [^u]s
SFX S  s   i   [^u]s
SFX S  s   î   [^u]s
SFX S  s   m   [u]s
SFX S  s   0   [u]s
SFX S  us  û   [u]s




SFX m Y 67
SFX m  a     âm    a
SFX m  a     âs    a
SFX m  as    âm    [a]s
SFX m  as    âs    [a]s
SFX m  as    u     [a]s
SFX m  e     u    [^bcdlmnpstvz]e
SFX m  e     ju   [bmpv]e
SFX m  ce    èu   [c]e
SFX m  de    þu   [d]e
SFX m  le    ïu   [^l]le
SFX m  lle   ïïu  [l]le
SFX m  ne    òu   [^lsz][n]e
SFX m  lne   ïòu  [l]ne
SFX m  sne   ðòu  [s]ne
SFX m  zne   þòu  [z]ne
SFX m  se    ðu   [s]e
SFX m  te    ðu   [^s]te
SFX m  te    tu   [^k]ste
SFX m  ste   ðu   [k]ste
SFX m  ze    þu   [z]e
SFX m  e     çm   [e]
SFX m  e     çs   [e]
SFX m  es      u   [^bcdlmnpstvz]es
SFX m  es     ju   [bmpv]es
SFX m  ces    èu   [c]es
SFX m  des    þu   [d]es
SFX m  les    ïu   [^l]les
SFX m  lles   ïïu  [l]les
SFX m  nes    òu   [^sz][n]es
SFX m  lnes   ïòu  [l]nes
SFX m  snes   ðòu  [s]nes
SFX m  znes   þòu  [z]nes
SFX m  ses    ðu   [s]es
SFX m  tes    ðu   [^s]tes
SFX m  tes    tu   [^k]stes
SFX m  stes   ðu   [k]stes
SFX m  zes    þu   [z]es
SFX m  es     çm   [e]s
SFX m  es     çs   [e]s
SFX m  s     is   [^aeiu]s
SFX m  s     u    [^aeiudlntsvz]s
SFX m  ds    þu   [d]s
SFX m  ls    ïu   [l]s
SFX m  ns    òu   [^s]ns
SFX m  sns   ðòu  [s]ns
SFX m  s     ju   [v]s
SFX m  zs    þu   [z]s
SFX m  s     îm   [^aeiu]s
SFX m  s     îs   [^aeiu]s
SFX m  s     u    [s]s
SFX m  ts    ðu   [^âîurs]ts
SFX m  ts    tu   [âîurs]ts
SFX m  is     u    [^dlntsvz]is
SFX m  dis    þu   [d]is
SFX m  lis    ïu   [l]is
SFX m  nis    òu   [^s]nis
SFX m  snis   ðòu  [s]nis
SFX m  is     ju   [v]is
SFX m  zis    þu   [z]is
SFX m  is     îm   [i]s
SFX m  is     îs   [i]s
SFX m  is     u    [s]is
SFX m  tis    ðu   [^âîurs]tis
SFX m  tis    tu   [âîurs]tis
SFX m  us    i     [u]s
SFX m  us    iem   [u]s
SFX m  us    os    [u]s


SFX s Y 30
SFX s  a     iòa   [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iòas  [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iòai  [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iòu   [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iòâ   [^gk]a
SFX s  a     iò    [^gk]a
SFX s  ga    dziòa   [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziòas  [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziòai  [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziòu   [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziòâ   [g]a
SFX s  ga    dziò    [g]a
SFX s  ka    ciòa   [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciòas  [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciòai  [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciòu   [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciòâ   [^s]ka
SFX s  ka    ciò    [^s]ka
SFX s  a     iòa     [s]ka
SFX s  a     iòas    [s]ka
SFX s  a     iòai    [s]ka
SFX s  a     iòu     [s]ka
SFX s  a     iòâ     [s]ka
SFX s  a     iò     [s]ka
SFX s  e     ît    [e]
SFX s  e     îte   [e]
SFX s  e     îtes  [e]
SFX s  e     îtei  [e]
SFX s  e     îti   [e]
SFX s  e     îtç   [e]


SFX f Y 11
SFX f  a   iòâm    [^gk]a
SFX f  a   iòâs    [^gk]a
SFX f  ga  dziòâm   [g]a
SFX f  ga  dziòâs   [g]a
SFX f  ka  ciòâm   [^s]ka
SFX f  ka  ciòâs   [^s]ka
SFX f  a   iòâm    [s]ka
SFX f  a   iòâs    [s]ka
SFX f  e   îðu     [e]
SFX f  e   îtçm    [e]
SFX f  e   îtçs    [e]
