lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
Albîna/Smsf
Alda/Smsf
Anna/Smsf
Annemarija/Smsf
Antis/Pjuw
Baòuta/Smsf
Beatrise/Smsf
Centis/Pjuw
Danute/Smsf
Dauma/Smsf
Dzidris/Pjuw
Elfa/Smsf
Elfrîda/Smsf
Elma/Smsf
Frîda/Smsf
Frîderika/Smsf
Gogolis/P
Gunvaris/Pjuw
Helçna/Smsf
Hermanis/Pjuw
Ildze/Smsf
Ileâna/Smsf
Irita/Smsf
Irma/Smsf
Justîne/Smsf
Ksenija/Smsf
Kârlis/Pjuw
Laida/Smsf
Liepupe/S
Margota/Smsf
Marija/Smsf
Miíelis/Pjuw
Pepija/Smsf
Raganiezis/P
Raina/Smsf
Ranta/Smsf
Saivis/Pjuw
Signija/Smsf
Skaidris/Pjuw
Staòislava/Smsf
Stella/Smsf
Sîmanis/Pjuw
Varnesis/Pjuw
Vilma/Smsf
Violeta/Smsf
adatprinteris/Pj
aerodinamika/S
agropilsçta/Sm
aizgrieznis/Pj
aizmetnis/Pjuw
aizrâvuğa/+mS
aizvainotâjs/Oix
aktînija/Sm
akustiíis/Pjx
amatbrâlis/Pj
amçba/Smsf
apakğkopa/Smsf
apakğslânis/Pjuw
apaugïotâjs/Oix
apgâdâtîba/Sm
aplis/Pjuw
apmâcâma/+mS
apmânîtâjs/Oix
arborists/Oix
aronija/Sm
asinsíermenis/Pj
atdure/Smsf
atminçtâjs/Oix
atspernazis/Pj
atvilğana/mS
audşumâsa/Smsf
augğupkonvertçğana/Sm
aukla/Smsf
ausainis/Pjuw
austrietis/Pjx
austrâlietis/Pjx
baltacis/Pj
bastotâjs/Oix
berlînietis/Pjx
bioniíis/Pjx
bizonis/Pjuw
blondîne/Sm
boja/Smsf
bombardieris/Pj
bonitçğana/S
briedinâtâjs/Oix
broğa/Smsf
bruòukuìis/Pj
brçkulis/Pjuwx
burkğíis/Pjuw
bçris/Pjuw
bïauris/Pjuwx
cepinâtâjs/Oix
ceturdaïa/Smsf
ciba/Smsf
cietlapis/Pj
cinis/Pjuw
citronmarmelâde/Sm
civetkaíis/Pj
daina/Sm
darbaudzinâtâjs/Oix
daudzdarbis/Pj
desantkuìis/Pj
desmitgadnieks/Oix
deíis/Pjuw
direkcija/Sm
divdabis/Pj
dogmatiíis/Pjx
dubultnodoklis/Pj
dumiíis/Pjuwx
dvçsele/Smsf
dzimtene/Smsf
dzîvdzemdçtâjs/Oix
dzîve/Smsf
dâlderis/Pjuw
dîriíis/Pjx
eirofakultâte/Sm
elektronmikroskopists/Oix
etiíis/Pj
fağîna/Sm
fizika/Sm
fûzelis/Pj
gaujmalietis/Pjx
gaïa/Smsf
germânijûdeòradis/P
goba/Smsf
grâbeklis/Pjuw
grâmatvedîba/Sm
grâvis/Pjuw
guïamvieta/Sm
hlorfluorogleklis/P
iekrîtama/m+S
iemiesotâjs/Oix
iepleğamâka/+Sm
infantilitâte/Sm
izbûruğus/m
izdomâtâjs/Oix
izlase/Smsf
izpildmodulis/Pj
izrûkğana/Sm
izviïama/Sm+
jaunava/Smsf
jûrmalietis/Pjx
kahetînietis/Pjx
kamielis/Pjuw
karboksilâze/Sm
katolis/Pj
kinofilma/Smsf
klaburèûska/Sm
kleinkâjis/Pjuw
kleita/Smsf
knikğíis/Pjuw
komandants/Oix
konditoreja/Sm
kopotâjveltnis/Pj
krautne/Sm
kristietis/Pjx
kumeïâda/Sm
kumode/Smsf
kunkulis/Pjuw
kurnçtâjs/Oix
kâja/Smsf
kûlis/Pjuw
ledusskapis/Pj
liekğíere/Sm
lokmçle/Smsf
luga/Smsf
lâcis/Pjuw
lâsma/Smsf
lçpis/Pjuw
lîdzatbildçtâjs/Oix
magnçtiíis/Pj
meistardarbnîca/Sm
merkaptopropionskâbe/Sm
metâlrestaurators/Oix
mietpilsonis/Pjx
misiòkalis/Pj
moğíis/Pjuw
mugursoma/Smsf
mâja/Smsf
mçrkarte/Sm
mçteïdrçbe/Sm
nagainis/Pj
namsaimnieks/Oix
neapolietis/Pjx
neğíiramîba/Sm
nobrauktâka/+mS
nosprostotâjs/Oix
noveikğana/Sm
novelkoğa/+mS
omlete/Smsf
padauza/Smsf
paeglis/Pjuw
pakârğoğa/Sm+
palaidnis/Pj
paliekoğa/S+m
pamatstrâdnieks/Oix
pasegğana/mS
paspriegğana/Sm
pelde/Smsf
pidşama/Smsf
pieboğana/Sm
piecacis/Pj
piekauğana/Sm
pieleòíis/Pj
pieninieks/Oix
pigiòa/Sm
pirmuzskaite/Sm
plaudis/Puwj
pornozvaigzne/Smsf
priekğceplis/Pj
priekğdzeroklis/Pj
priekğlapa/Smsf
priekğstrâdnieks/Oix
priekğvçrpğana/Sm
pusmute/Sm
pârmçrîba/Sm
pârmçrîtâjs/Oix
pârğmaukğana/Sm
pçlis/Pjuw
pîpmanis/Pj
pîïknâbis/Pj
rasa/Smsf
referencsistçma/Sm
regulators/Oix
relîze/Smsf
riòíis/Pjuw
ruksis/Pjuw
rumâniete/Sm
runkulis/Pj
saistîtâjs/Oix
sanitâre/Smsf
saruna/Smsf
saskrçjuğus/m
savienojamîba/Sm+
seğspârnis/Pj
sienâzis/Pjuw
sirpis/Pjuw
skaitïotâjs/Oix
skate/Smsf
slaucçja/Smsf
sloksne/Smsf
smilğakmens/Pj
smurgulis/Pjuwx
sniegpulkstenis/Pj
steliòìis/Pjuw
stoiíis/Pjx
straumdatne/Sm
struktûra/Smsf
strâdâtgriba/S
stulbenis/Pjuw
stunda/Smsf+
stûrdzelis/Pj
sîkputeklis/Pjuw
tecîla/Smsf
teletornis/Pj
tenkotâjs/Oix
terîne/Smsf
teteris/Pjuw
tetrationskâbe/Sm
tunelis/Pjuw
turçtâjrâmis/Pj
tîrradnis/Pj
ucinâmâka/+Sm
uzknâbğana/mS
uzliesmotâjs/Oix
vanna/Smsf
vecis/Pjuw
vecpilsçta/Smsf
veidne/Smsf
vençcietis/Pjx
vicepremjerministrs/Oix
viduklis/Pjuw
vizualizâcija/S
vârpsta/Smsf
vçmeklis/Pj
vçrpçja/Smsf+
vçzçklis/Pjuw
zaglis/Pjuw
ziloòmâte/Smsf
zivkopis/Pjx
zîdkopis/Pjx
âdere/Smsf
âpsis/Pjuw
çna/Smsf
çrzelis/Pjuw
ğamanis/Pjuw
ğíaudîtâjs/Oix
ğíemba/Smsf
ğíindelis/Pj
ğíçrsiela/Smsf
ğîrgaïa/Smsf
şâvuğa/S+m
